Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 3. Nonforfeiture Benefits on Old Policies

§ 26-16-301.
Nonforfeiture benefits on old policies.

In the case of policies referred to in W.S.

26-16-102

and issued prior to the operative date of article 2 of this chapter, there shall be a provision which, in case of default in premium payments after premiums are paid for three (3) years, shall secure to the policy owner, as a nonforfeiture benefit, a stipulated form of insurance, the net value of which is at least equal to the minimum life insurance reserve at the date of the default on the policy and on any dividend addition thereto, as required by article 2 of chapter 6 of this code, less a sum not more than two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the amount insured by the policy and of any existing dividend additions thereto, and less any existing indebtedness to the insurer on or secured by the policy.

The net value specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be determined on the basis of a mortality table and rate of interest stated in the policy and acceptable for the valuation of the policy pursuant to the standard valuation law, except that if the mortality table is a more modern table than the American experience table of mortality, a mortality rate not more than one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the mortality rate according to the more modern table may be used in calculating any extended insurance, with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit. If the mortality table used as the basis of determining the net value is the commissioners’ 1958 standard ordinary mortality table, the mortality rates to be assumed in calculating any extended insurance, with accompanying pure endowment, if any, shall not be more than those shown in the commissioners’ 1958 extended term insurance table.

The provision specified in subsection (a) of this section shall:

Stipulate that the policy may be surrendered to the insurer at its home office within one (1) month from date of default, for a specified cash value equal to the sum which would otherwise be available for the purchase of insurance as specified in subsection (a) of this section, and may stipulate that the insurer may defer payment for not more than six (6) months after the application therefor is made;

Contain a table showing the options available under the policy each year upon default in premium payments during the first twenty (20) years of the policy, or during the term of the policy whichever is shorter;

Not be required in term insurances of twenty (20) years or less or in industrial life insurance policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 365; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-365; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-128; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1994, ch. 76, § 2.